Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6865YC (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 280.13, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 3 school year, the corporation, association, or organization 4 observes the noncontact periods described in this subparagraph, 5 during which a coach, director, or teacher shall not have 6 contact with students regarding extracurricular interscholastic 7 athletic contests or competitions, including athletics, 8 dance or cheerleading, band, show choir, and theater, 9 and extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or 10 competitions do not occur. All high school students, including 11 incoming ninth grade students, shall be subject to a noncontact 12 period and shall not have contact, on or off school premises, 13 with coaches, directors, or teachers, or use school facilities 14 for extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or 15 competitions during a noncontact period. 16 (b) The summer noncontact period must consist of a 17 continuous ten-day period occurring during the summer. 18 (c) The fall noncontact period must consist of a continuous 19 seven-day period occurring in November. 20 (d) The winter noncontact period must consist of the 21 continuous period occurring between December 25 and January 1. 22 (e) The spring noncontact period must consist of a 23 continuous seven-day period occurring during the spring break 24 period. 25 (f) Organizations that operate nonschool-sponsored 26 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or 27 competitions in this state shall observe the noncontact periods 28 in this subparagraph. 29